West Virginia, session 2026, HB5514.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. DIVISION NOT TO MANDATE PARTICITATION IN THE Real ID Act of 2005, Public Law 1090-13. §17B-8-1. Legislative finding; prohibiting implementation of REAL ID Act. (a) The Legislature finds that the enactment into law by the United States Congress of the REAL ID Act of 2005, as part of Public Law 109-13, is inimical to the security and well-being of the people of West Virginia, will cause unneeded expense and inconvenience to the people of this state and was adopted by the United States Congress in violation of the principles of federalism contained in the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution.(b) The State of West Virginia may not participate in the mandatory implementation of the REAL ID Act of 2005 insofar as it requires the establishment of national standards for state-issued driver’s licenses and nondriver identification cards. The Department of Transportation, including the Division of Motor Vehicles, is directed to cease mandatory implementation of the provisions of the REAL ID Act of 2005 insofar as it requires the establishment of national standards for state-issued driver’s licenses and nondriver identification cards and to report to the Governor any attempt by agencies or agents of the United States Department of Homeland Security to secure the implementation of that portion of the REAL ID Act of 2005 through the operations of that division. Citizens may obtain a REAL ID Act state-issued driver’s license or nondriver identification cards from the Division of Motor Vehicles only if they so desire.